Utah statutes.
70A-4a-212.   Liability and duty of receiving bank regarding unaccepted
payment order.
If a receiving bank fails to accept a payment order that it is obliged by
express agreement to accept, the bank is liable for breach of the agreement to
the extent as provided in the agreement or in this chapter, but does not
otherwise have any duty to accept a payment order or, before acceptance, to
take any action, or refrain from taking action, with respect to the order
except as provided in this chapter or by express agreement.  Liability based
on acceptance arises only when acceptance occurs as stated in Section 70A-
4a-209 and liability is limited to that provided in this chapter.  A receiving
bank is not the agent of the sender or beneficiary of the payment order it
accepts, or of any other party to the funds transfer, and the bank owes no
duty to any party to the funds transfer except as provided in this chapter or
by express agreement.
